Missouri, session 2026, HB2779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 550.320, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 550.320 and 630.1200, to read as follows:
550.320. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of corrections of the state of Missouri;
(2) "Jail reimbursement", a daily per diem paid by the state for the reimbursement of
time spent in custody.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, whenever any person is
sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional center, the department shall reimburse
the county or city not within a county for the days the person spent in custody at a per diem
cost, subject to appropriation, but not to exceed [thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents] forty
dollars per day per offender. The jail reimbursement shall be subject to review and approval
of the department. The state shall pay the costs when:
(1) A person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment as authorized by chapter 558;
(2) A person is sentenced pursuant to section 559.115;
(3) A person has his or her probation or parole revoked because the offender has, or
allegedly has, violated any condition of the offender's probation or parole, and such probation
or parole is a consequence of a violation of the law, or the offender is a fugitive from the state
or otherwise held at the request of the department regardless of whether or not a warrant has
been issued; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2779 2
(4) A person has a period of detention imposed pursuant to section 559.026.
3. When the final determination of any criminal prosecution shall be such as to render
the state liable for costs under existing laws, it shall be the duty of the office of the sheriff or
the chief executive officer of the city not within a county to certify the total number of days
any offender who was a party in such case remained in the jail and submit the total number of
days spent in custody to the department. The office of the sheriff or chief executive officer of
the city not within a county may submit claims to the department, no later than two years
from the date the claim became eligible for reimbursement.
4. The department shall determine if the expenses are eligible pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and remit any payment to the county or city not within a county
when the expenses are determined to be eligible. The department shall establish, by rule, the
process for submission of claims. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2025,
shall be invalid and void.
630.1200. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of mental health;
(2) "Jail reimbursement", a daily rate paid by the state for the reimbursement of
time spent in custody.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, whenever it is
determined that a person in the custody of a jail within a county or city not within a
county lacks capacity to understand the proceedings against him or her or to assist in his
or her own defense as a result of mental disease or defect, the department shall
reimburse the county or city not within a county for the time the person spent in custody
at a rate of one hundred fifty dollars per day, subject to appropriation. The jail
reimbursement shall be subject to review and approval of the department.
3. The department shall pay the costs under subsection 2 of this section when a
person is determined to lack mental fitness to proceed in a trial or conviction under
section 552.020 and the person is in the custody of the sheriff.
4. It shall be the duty of the office of the sheriff or the chief executive officer of a
city not within a county to certify the total number of days any person who lacks mental
fitness to proceed in a trial or conviction under section 552.020 remained in the custody
of the sheriff in the jail and submit to the department the total number of days spent in

HB 2779 3
custody. The office of the sheriff or chief executive officer of a city not within a county
shall submit claims to the department no later than two years from the date the claim
became eligible for reimbursement.
5. The department shall determine if the expenses are eligible pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and remit any payment to the county or city not within a
county when the expenses are determined to be eligible. The department shall establish,
by rule, the process for submission of claims. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔